Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-329
State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash
Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges. The fund shall include transfers from the Civic and Community Center
Financing Fund, revenue received from gifts, grants, bequests, donations,
other similar donation arrangements, or other contributions from public or
private sources, and such other revenue as may accrue to the State Colleges
Sport Facilities Cash Fund. Expenditures from the fund are authorized to support
renovation and construction of or improvements to facilities for intercollegiate
athletics and student fitness, recreation, and sport activities at the Nebraska
state colleges. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2012, LB969, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.